North Carolina, session 2025, SB969.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to provide first grade students with access to in-person and virtual
high-dosage early literacy tutoring that is based on the science of reading.
SECTION 2. G.S. 115C-83.6(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Local school administrative units are encouraged to partner with community
organizations, businesses, and other groups to provide volunteers, mentors, or tutors to assist
with the provision of literacy interventions that enhance reading development and proficiency.
Tutoring may be provided virtually."
SECTION 3. G.S. 115C-83.10 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-83.10. Accountability measures.
(a) Each local board of education shall publish annually on a website maintained by that
local school administrative unit and report in writing to the State Board of Education by
September 1 of each year the following information on the prior school year:year, disaggregated
by school for each grade level in which there are at least 30 students:
(1) The number and percentage of third grade students demonstrating and not
demonstrating reading proficiency on the State-approved standardized test of
reading comprehension administered to third grade students.
(2) The number and percentage of third grade students who take and pass an
alternative assessment of reading comprehension and the name of each
alternative assessment used for this purpose with the number of students who
passed it.
(3) The number and percentage of third grade students retained for not
demonstrating reading proficiency.
(4) The number and percentage of third grade students exempt from mandatory
third grade retention by category of exemption as listed in G.S. 115C-83.7(b).
(5) The number and percentage of first grade students demonstrating and not
demonstrating reading comprehension at grade level.
(6) The number and percentage of second grade students demonstrating and not
demonstrating reading comprehension at grade level.
*S969-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(7) For each grade level, the number and percentage of students eligible for
priority enrollment in reading camp under G.S. 115C-83.11(b) and, for each
grade level, the number and percentage of those students who attend reading
camp.
…."
SECTION 4. Section 1 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2026. The remainder of
this act is effective when it becomes law. Section 3 of this act applies beginning with information
published and reported in the 2026-2027 school year.
Page 2 Senate Bill 969-First Edition